District of Columbia statutes.
7-881.11

Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-121, § 13, 61 DCR 5680